Indiana, session 2026, SB218.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 6-1.1-20.6-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 73, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "property tax liability"
means, for purposes of:
(1) this chapter, other than section 7.7 or 8.5 of this chapter,
liability for the tax imposed on property under this article
determined after application of all credits and deductions under
this article or IC 6-3.6, except the credit granted by section 7 or
7.5 of this chapter, but does not include any interest or penalty
imposed under this article;
(2) section 8.5 of this chapter, liability for the tax imposed on
property under this article determined after application of all
credits and deductions under this article or IC 6-3.6, including the
credits granted by sections 7, 7.5 and 7.7 of this chapter, but not
including the credit granted under section 8.5 of this chapter or
any interest or penalty imposed under this article; and
(3) section 7.7 of this chapter, liability for the tax imposed on
2026 IN 218—LS 6925/DI 120


property under this article determined after application of all
credits and deductions under this article or IC 6-3.6, including the
credit granted by section 7 or 7.5 of this chapter, but not including
the credits granted under section 7.7 or 8.5 of this chapter or any
interest or penalty imposed under this article.
SECTION 2. IC 6-1.1-20.6-7 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 7. (a) This subsection applies to property taxes first due
and payable in 2009. A person is entitled to a credit against the person's
property tax liability for property taxes first due and payable in 2009.
The amount of the credit is the amount by which the person's property
tax liability attributable to the person's:
(1) homestead exceeds one and five-tenths percent (1.5%);
(2) residential property exceeds two and five-tenths percent
(2.5%);
(3) long term care property exceeds two and five-tenths percent
(2.5%);
(4) agricultural land exceeds two and five-tenths percent (2.5%);
(5) nonresidential real property exceeds three and five-tenths
percent (3.5%); or
(6) personal property exceeds three and five-tenths percent
(3.5%);
of the gross assessed value of the property that is the basis for
determination of property taxes for that calendar year.
(b) This subsection applies to property taxes first due and payable
in 2009. Property taxes imposed after being approved by the voters in
a referendum or local public question shall not be considered for
purposes of calculating a person's credit under this section.
(c) This subsection applies to property taxes first due and payable
in 2009. As used in this subsection, "eligible county" means only a
county for which the general assembly determines in 2008 that limits
to property tax liability under this chapter are expected to reduce in
2010 the aggregate property tax revenue that would otherwise be
collected by all units of local government and school corporations in
the county by at least twenty percent (20%). Property taxes imposed in
an eligible county to pay debt service or make lease payments for
bonds or leases issued or entered into before July 1, 2008, shall not be
considered for purposes of calculating a person's credit under this
section.
SECTION 3. IC 6-1.1-20.6-7.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.205-2013,
SECTION 77, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7.5. (a) A person is entitled to a credit against the
person's property tax liability. for property taxes first due and payable
2026 IN 218—LS 6925/DI 120


after 2009. The amount of the credit is the amount by which the
person's property tax liability attributable to the person's:
(1) homestead exceeds one percent (1%), except as provided in
subsection (c);
(2) residential property exceeds two percent (2%);
(3) long term care property exceeds two percent (2%);
(4) agricultural land exceeds two percent (2%);
(5) nonresidential real property exceeds three percent (3%); or
(6) personal property exceeds three percent (3%);
of the gross assessed value of the property that is the basis for
determination of property taxes for that calendar year.
(b) This subsection applies to property taxes first due and payable
after 2009. Property taxes imposed after being approved by the voters
in a referendum or local public question shall not be considered for
purposes of calculating a person's credit under this section.
(c) This subsection applies to property taxes first due and payable
after 2009. As used in this subsection, "eligible county" means only a
county for which the general assembly determines in 2008 that limits
to property tax liability under this chapter are expected to reduce in
2010 the aggregate property tax revenue that would otherwise be
collected by all units of local government and school corporations in
the county by at least twenty percent (20%). Property taxes imposed in
an eligible county:
(1) to pay debt service:
(A) on bonds issued before July 1, 2008; or
(B) on bonds that:
(i) are issued to refund bonds originally issued before July
1, 2008; and
(ii) have a maturity date that is not later than the maturity
date of the bonds refunded;
(2) to make lease payments on leases entered into before July 1,
2008, to secure bonds;
(3) to make lease payments on leases:
(A) that are amended to refund bonds secured by leases
entered into before July 1, 2008; and
(B) that have a term that is not longer than the term of the
leases amended; or
(4) to make lease payments on leases:
(A) that secure bonds:
(i) issued to refund bonds originally issued before July 1,
2008; and
(ii) that have a maturity date that is not later than the
2026 IN 218—LS 6925/DI 120


maturity date of the bonds refunded; and
(B) that have a term that ends not later than the maturity date
of the bonds refunded;
shall not be considered for purposes of calculating a person's credit
under this section.
(c) The fiscal body of a county, city, or town may adopt an
ordinance to reduce the property tax liability percentage cap set
forth in subsection (a)(1) for homesteads to a percentage that is less
than one percent (1%) but not less than zero percent (0%). The
following apply if a fiscal body adopts an ordinance under this
subsection:
(1) For purposes of subsection (a)(1), the property tax liability
percentage cap shall be the percentage adopted by the fiscal
body of the county, city, or town.
(2) The reduced property tax liability percentage cap shall
apply to taxes first due and payable in the ensuing year
following the adoption of the ordinance and each year
thereafter that the ordinance remains in effect.
(3) The reduced property tax liability percentage cap shall be
applied in determining the net property tax revenue of the
county, city, or town that adopted the ordinance and not any
other taxing unit within the taxing district, which shall be
determined as if the county, city, or town had not adopted an
ordinance under this subsection.
(4) If a county fiscal body adopts an ordinance under this
subsection or rescinds an ordinance previously adopted, the
county fiscal body shall, not later than fifteen (15) days after
the adoption of the ordinance, give notice of the adoption of
the ordinance to:
(A) the department on the form and in the manner
prescribed by the department; and
(B) the county auditor.
SECTION 4. IC 6-1.1-20.6-9.8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.9-2024,
SECTION 171, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9.8. (a) This section applies to
property taxes first due and payable after December 31, 2009.
(b) The following definitions apply throughout this section:
(1) "Debt service obligations of a political subdivision" refers to:
(A) the principal and interest payable during a calendar year
on bonds; and
(B) lease rental payments payable during a calendar year on
leases;
2026 IN 218—LS 6925/DI 120


of a political subdivision payable from ad valorem property taxes.
(2) "Protected taxes" refers to the following:
(A) Property taxes that are exempted from the application of
a credit granted under section 7 or 7.5 of this chapter by
section 7(b), 7(c), 7.5(b) or 7.5(c) of this chapter or another
law.
(B) Property taxes imposed by a political subdivision to pay
for debt service obligations of a political subdivision that are
not exempted from the application of a credit granted under
section 7 or 7.5 of this chapter by section 7(b), 7(c), 7.5(b) or
7.5(c) of this chapter or any other law. Property taxes
described in this clause are subject to the credit granted under
section 7 or 7.5 of this chapter by section 7(b), 7(c), 7.5(b) or
7.5(c) of this chapter regardless of their designation as
protected taxes.
(3) "Unprotected taxes" refers to property taxes that are not
protected taxes.
(c) Except as provided in section 9.9 of this chapter, the total
amount of revenue to be distributed to the fund for which the protected
taxes were imposed shall be determined as if no credit were granted
under section 7 or 7.5 of this chapter. The total amount of the loss in
revenue resulting from the granting of credits under section 7 or 7.5 of
this chapter must reduce only the amount of unprotected taxes
distributed to a fund using the following criteria:
(1) The reduction may be allocated in the amounts determined by
the political subdivision using a combination of unprotected taxes
of the political subdivision in those taxing districts in which the
credit caused a reduction in protected taxes.
(2) The tax revenue and each fund of any other political
subdivisions must not be affected by the reduction.
(d) When:
(1) the revenue that otherwise would be distributed to a fund
receiving only unprotected taxes is reduced entirely under
subsection (c) and the remaining revenue is insufficient for a fund
receiving protected taxes to receive the revenue specified by
subsection (c); or
(2) there is not a fund receiving only unprotected taxes from
which to distribute revenue;
the revenue distributed to the fund receiving protected taxes must also
be reduced. If the revenue distributed to a fund receiving protected
taxes is reduced, the political subdivision may transfer money from one
(1) or more of the other funds of the political subdivision to offset the
2026 IN 218—LS 6925/DI 120


loss in revenue to the fund receiving protected taxes. The transfer is
limited to the amount necessary for the fund receiving protected taxes
to receive the revenue specified under subsection (c). The amount
transferred shall be specifically identified as a debt service obligation
transfer for each affected fund.
SECTION 5. IC 6-1.1-20.6-9.9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.236-2023,
SECTION 39, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9.9. (a) This subsection applies to credits
allocated before January 1, 2024. If:
(1) a school corporation after July 1, 2016, issues new bonds or
enters into a new lease rental agreement for which the school
corporation is imposing or will impose a debt service levy other
than:
(A) to refinance or renew prior bond or lease rental obligations
existing before January 1, 2017; or
(B) indebtedness that is approved in a local public question or
referendum under IC 6-1.1-20 or any other law; and
(2) the school corporation's:
(A) total debt service levy is greater than the school
corporation's total debt service levy in 2016; and
(B) total debt service tax rate is greater than the school
corporation's total debt service tax rate in 2016;
the school corporation is not eligible to allocate credits proportionately
under this section.
(b) This subsection applies to credits allocated after December 31,
2023. A school corporation is not eligible to allocate credits
proportionately under this section, if a school corporation after July 1,
2023, issues new bonds or enters into a new lease rental agreement for
which the school corporation is imposing or will impose a debt service
levy other than:
(1) to refinance or renew prior bond or lease rental obligations
existing before January 1, 2024, but only if the refinancing or
renewal is for a lower interest rate; or
(2) indebtedness that is approved in a local public question or
referendum under IC 6-1.1-20 or any other law.
(c) Subject to subsection (a) (before January 1, 2024) and
subsection (b) (after December 31, 2023), a school corporation is
eligible to allocate credits proportionately under this section for 2019,
2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, or 2026 if the school corporation's
percentage computed under this subsection is at least ten percent (10%)
for its operations fund levy as certified by the department of local
government finance. A school corporation shall compute its percentage
2026 IN 218—LS 6925/DI 120


under this subsection as determined under the following formula:
STEP ONE: Determine the amount of credits granted under this
chapter against the school corporation's levy for the school
corporation's operations fund.
STEP TWO: Determine the amount of the school corporation's
levy that is attributable to new debt incurred after June 30, 2019,
but is not attributable to the debt service levy described in
subsection (a)(1)(B) (before January 1, 2024) or subsection (b)(2)
(after December 31, 2023).
STEP THREE: Determine the result of the school corporation's
total levy minus any referendum levy.
STEP FOUR: Subtract the STEP TWO amount from the STEP
THREE amount.
STEP FIVE: Divide the STEP FOUR amount by the STEP
THREE amount expressed as a percentage.
STEP SIX: Multiply the STEP ONE amount by the STEP FIVE
percentage.
STEP SEVEN: Determine the school corporation's levy for the
school corporation's operations fund.
STEP EIGHT: Divide the STEP SIX amount by the STEP SEVEN
amount expressed as a percentage.
The computation must be made by taking into account the requirements
of section 9.8 of this chapter regarding protected taxes and the impact
of credits granted under this chapter on the revenue to be distributed to
the school corporation's operations fund for the particular year.
(d) A school corporation that desires to be an eligible school
corporation under this section must, before May 1 of the year for which
it wants a determination, submit a written request for a certification by
the department of local government finance that the computation of the
school corporation's percentage under subsection (c) is correct. The
department of local government finance shall, not later than June 1 of
that year, determine whether the percentage computed by the school
corporation under subsection (c) is accurate and certify whether the
school corporation is eligible under this section.
(e) For a school corporation that is certified as eligible under this
section, the school corporation may allocate the effect of the credits
granted under this chapter proportionately among all the school
corporation's property tax funds that are not exempt under section
7.5(b) or 7.5(c) of this chapter, based on the levy for each fund and
without taking into account the requirements of section 9.8 of this
chapter regarding protected taxes as determined under the following
formula:
2026 IN 218—LS 6925/DI 120


STEP ONE: Determine the product of:
(A) the percentage determined under STEP EIGHT of
subsection (c); multiplied by
(B) five (5).
STEP TWO: Determine the lesser of the STEP ONE percentage
or one hundred percent (100%).
STEP THREE: Determine the product of:
(A) the amount determined under STEP SIX of subsection (c);
multiplied by
(B) the STEP TWO percentage.
The school corporation may allocate the amount of credits determined
under STEP THREE proportionately under this section. The
department of local government finance shall include in its certification
of an eligible school corporation under subsection (d) the amount of
credits that the school corporation may allocate proportionately as
determined under this subsection.
(f) This section expires January 1, 2027.
SECTION 6. IC 6-1.1-20.6-13, AS ADDED BY P.L.241-2017,
SECTION 16, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 13. (a) A political subdivision is eligible to
allocate credits proportionately under this section if the distressed unit
appeal board has approved the waiver request of the emergency
manager for the political subdivision under IC 6-1.1-20.3-8.5.
(b) For a political subdivision that has been granted a waiver under
IC 6-1.1-20.3-8.5, the political subdivision may allocate the effect of
the credits granted under this chapter proportionately among all the
political subdivision's property tax funds that are not exempt under
section 7.5(b) or 7.5(c) of this chapter, based on the levy for each fund
and without taking into account the requirements of section 9.8 of this
chapter regarding protected taxes.
SECTION 7. IC 6-2.5-11-2 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. As used in this
chapter:
(1) "Agreement" means the Streamlined Sales and Use Tax
Agreement.
(2) "Certified automated system" means software certified jointly
by the states that are signatories to the agreement to calculate the
tax imposed by each jurisdiction on a transaction, to determine
the amount of tax to remit to the appropriate state, and to maintain
a record of the transaction.
(3) "Certified service provider" means an agent certified jointly by
the states that are signatories to the agreement to perform all of
2026 IN 218—LS 6925/DI 120


the seller's sales tax functions.
(4) "Person" means an individual, a trust, an estate, a fiduciary, a
partnership, a limited liability company, a limited liability
partnership, a corporation, or any other legal entity.
(5) "Sales tax" means:
(A) the state gross retail tax levied under IC 6-2.5; and
(B) the local option gross retail tax imposed under
IC 6-3.5-12.
(6) "Seller" means any person making sales, leases, or rentals of
personal property or services.
(7) "State" means any state of the United States and the District
of Columbia.
(8) "Use tax" means the use tax levied under IC 6-2.5.
SECTION 8. IC 6-2.5-11-13 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 13. (a) As used in this section, "local taxing
jurisdiction" means the taxing jurisdiction of a political
subdivision.
(b) As used in this section, "taxing jurisdiction" means the
geographical territory of the state or a political subdivision in
which a sales or use tax is in effect.
(c) The department shall maintain a data base that describes
boundary changes for all local taxing jurisdictions. The data base
must include a description of each change and the effective date of
the change.
(d) The department shall maintain a data base of all sales and
use tax rates for each jurisdiction in Indiana that levies a sales or
use tax. The state and each political subdivision in the data base
must be identified by codes that conform with Federal Information
Processing Standards, as developed by the National Institute of
Standards and Technology.
(e) The department shall maintain a data base that assigns to
each five (5) digit and nine (9) digit ZIP code in Indiana the taxing
jurisdictions within the ZIP code that levy a sales or use tax in the
taxing jurisdiction.
(f) The department shall maintain the data bases described in
subsections (c) through (e) in accordance with the requirements of
the agreement.
(g) The department shall allow sellers and certified service
providers access to the data bases described in subsections (c)
through (e).
(h) The department may contract with a vendor to maintain the
2026 IN 218—LS 6925/DI 120


data bases that the department is required to maintain under this
section.
SECTION 9. IC 6-2.5-11-14 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 14. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), a seller
or certified service provider is not liable for the tax, penalties, and
interest associated with charging and collecting the incorrect
amount of sales or use tax for a retail transaction if:
(1) the seller or certified service provider has relied on
erroneous data provided by the department in the data base
described in section 13(e) of this chapter; and
(2) the erroneous data provided by the department in the data
base described in section 13(e) of this chapter is the reason
that the seller or certified service provider charged and
collected the incorrect amount of sales or use tax on the retail
transaction.
(b) If the department:
(1) corrects the errors in the data base described in section
13(e) of this chapter; and
(2) provides the seller or certified service provider with notice
of the corrected data;
the relief provided by subsection (a) ceases ten (10) days after the
seller or certified service provider receives the department's notice
of corrected data.
SECTION 10. IC 6-3.5-12 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 12. Local Option Gross Retail Tax
Sec. 1. This chapter applies only to a county or municipality that
adopts an ordinance to reduce the homestead property tax cap
within its taxing jurisdiction under IC 6-1.1-20.6-7.5(c).
Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a local option
gross retail tax may be imposed by a county or municipality under
this chapter only during those calendar years in which the reduced
homestead property tax cap is applied under IC 6-1.1-20.6-7.5(c)
in the county or municipality for property taxes first due and
payable in the year.
Sec. 2. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the
definitions set forth in:
(1) IC 6-2.5-1; and
(2) IC 36-1-2;
apply throughout this chapter.
2026 IN 218—LS 6925/DI 120


Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "adopting county or
municipality" means a county or municipality that has adopted the
local option gross retail tax.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "gross retail income" has the
meaning set forth in IC 6-2.5-1-5, except that the term does not
include taxes imposed under IC 6-2.5 or IC 6-9.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "local option gross retail tax
district" of an adopting county or municipality means the
geographic territory in which the local option gross retail tax
adopted by the adopting county or municipality is imposed.
Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "municipality" means a city or
town.
Sec. 7. Using procedures described in this chapter, the fiscal
body of a county or municipality may adopt an ordinance to
impose or rescind the local option gross retail tax in the local
option gross retail tax district of the county or municipality.
Sec. 8. (a) An ordinance imposing the local option gross retail
tax under this chapter must specify the tax rate to be imposed
under this chapter, not to exceed one percent (1%).
(b) An ordinance imposing the local option gross retail tax
under this chapter must specify the date the local option gross
retail tax takes effect. A tax imposed under this chapter must take
effect on the first day of a calendar quarter. A tax imposed under
this chapter may not take effect until at least sixty (60) days after
the date the ordinance imposing the tax is adopted.
(c) An ordinance to rescind the local option gross retail tax must
specify the date the rescission of the tax takes effect.
Sec. 9. (a) An ordinance imposing the local option gross retail
tax under this chapter must specify the boundaries of the county or
municipality on the effective date of the local option gross retail
tax. The boundaries of the county or municipality on the effective
date of the local option gross retail tax are the initial boundaries of
the local option gross retail tax district of the county or
municipality.
(b) If at any time the boundaries of an adopting county or
municipality do not coincide with the boundaries of the local option
gross retail tax district of the adopting county or municipality, the
fiscal body of an adopting county or municipality may adopt an
ordinance to alter the boundaries of the local option gross retail tax
district to coincide with the boundaries of the adopting county or
municipality.
(c) An ordinance adopted under subsection (b) must specify the
2026 IN 218—LS 6925/DI 120


date on which the altered boundaries of the local option gross retail
tax district take effect. The altered boundaries of the local option
gross retail tax district must take effect on the first day of a
calendar quarter. The altered boundaries of the local option gross
retail tax district may not take effect until at least sixty (60) days
after the date on which the ordinance is adopted.
(d) An ordinance adopted under subsection (b) must specify the
changes to the boundaries of the local option gross retail tax
district of the adopting county.
Sec. 10. (a) If the fiscal body of a county or municipality adopts
an ordinance under this chapter, the fiscal body of the county or
municipality shall immediately send a certified copy of the
ordinance to the department.
(b) If:
(1) the fiscal body of a county or municipality adopts an
ordinance to impose the local option gross retail tax under
section 7 of this chapter; or
(2) the fiscal body of an adopting county or municipality
adopts an ordinance to change the boundaries of the adopting
municipality's local option gross retail tax district under
section 9 of this chapter;
the fiscal body shall immediately transmit information concerning
the boundaries of the local option gross retail tax district to the
department in an electronic format prescribed by the department.
Sec. 11. (a) A tax imposed under this chapter by the fiscal body
of an adopting county or municipality applies only to a retail
transaction that:
(1) is subject to the state gross retail tax; and
(2) is sourced to the local option gross retail tax district of the
adopting county or municipality under the sourcing rules of
IC 6-2.5.
(b) Subsection (a) applies to a local option gross retail tax
throughout the period an ordinance imposing the local option gross
retail tax is in effect. An amendment of the state gross retail tax
applies also to the local option gross retail tax in effect in an
adopting county or municipality on the date the amendment to the
state gross retail tax becomes effective.
Sec. 12. (a) This section applies to a retail transaction that is
subject to the local option gross retail tax.
(b) The local option gross retail tax is measured by the gross
retail income received by a retail merchant in a retail unitary
transaction and is imposed at the rate set forth in the ordinance
2026 IN 218—LS 6925/DI 120


imposing the tax. The rate must be stated as a whole percentage
point.
(c) A retail merchant may apply the rounding rule of
IC 6-2.5-2-2(b) to the unrounded total of:
(1) the state gross retail tax; plus
(2) the local option gross retail tax;
that is imposed on a retail transaction.
Sec. 13. (a) A person who receives goods or services in a retail
transaction that is taxed under this chapter is liable for the tax.
The person shall pay the tax to the retail merchant as a separate
amount added to the consideration for the goods or services. The
retail merchant shall collect the tax as an agent for the state and
the county. The tax imposed under this chapter shall be imposed,
paid, and collected in the same manner in which the state gross
retail tax is imposed, paid, and collected under IC 6-2.5.
(b) A county or municipality that imposes the local option gross
retail tax under this chapter is prohibited from conducting an audit
of any retail merchant or purchaser for the purpose of determining
whether the proper amount of local option gross retail tax has been
collected or paid.
Sec. 14. (a) A special account within the state general fund shall
be established for each adopting county or municipality that
imposes the local option gross retail tax. Revenue collected under
this chapter within an adopting county or municipality shall be
deposited in that adopting county's or municipality's account in the
state general fund.
(b) Income earned on money held in an account under
subsection (a) becomes a part of that account.
(c) Revenue remaining in an account established under
subsection (a) at the end of a fiscal year does not revert to the state
general fund.
Sec. 15. (a) Revenue derived from the imposition of the local
option gross retail tax shall, in the manner prescribed by this
section, be distributed to the adopting county or municipality that
imposed it. Revenue in a county's or municipality's special account
is appropriated to make the distributions required by this chapter.
(b) Before the fifteenth business day of each month, the state
comptroller shall distribute the amount specified in subsection (c)
to the fiscal officer of each adopting county or municipality.
(c) The amount to be distributed each month to an adopting
county or municipality under this section is the amount
accumulated at the end of the previous month in the adopting
2026 IN 218—LS 6925/DI 120


county's or municipality's special account established under section
14 of this chapter.
(d) The state comptroller may adjust the amount specified in
subsection (c) to account for mathematical or clerical errors
involving a previous distribution under this section. At the
discretion of the state comptroller, an adjustment under this
section may be prorated over two (2) or more future distributions
under this section.
Sec. 16. An adopting county or municipality may use local
option gross retail tax revenue received in a distribution under
section 15 of this chapter only to fund replacement of the county's
or municipality's property tax levy loss due to the adoption of a
reduced homestead property tax cap.
SECTION 11. IC 6-3.6-2-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.239-2017,
SECTION 14, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. "Adjusted gross income" has the meaning set
forth in IC 6-3-1-3.5. However:
(1) except as provided in subdivision (3), in the case of a local
taxpayer who is not treated as a resident local taxpayer of a
county, the term includes only adjusted gross income derived
from the taxpayer's principal place of business or employment;
(2) in the case of a resident local taxpayer of Perry County, the
term does not include adjusted gross income described in
IC 6-3.6-8-7; and
(3) in the case of a local taxpayer described in section 13(3) of
this chapter, the term includes only that part of the individual's
total income that:
(A) is apportioned to Indiana under IC 6-3-2-2.7 or
IC 6-3-2-3.2; and
(B) is paid to the individual as compensation for services
rendered in the county (or municipality in the case of a
special rate under IC 6-3.6-7-29) as a team member or race
team member.
SECTION 12. IC 6-3.6-2-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 95, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2028]: Sec. 2. "Adjusted gross income" has the meaning
set forth in IC 6-3-1-3.5. However:
(1) in the case of a resident local taxpayer of Perry County, the
term does not include adjusted gross income described in
IC 6-3.6-8-7; and
(2) in the case of a local taxpayer described in section 13(3) of
this chapter, the term includes only that part of the individual's
2026 IN 218—LS 6925/DI 120


total income that:
(A) is apportioned to Indiana under IC 6-3-2-2.7 or
IC 6-3-2-3.2; and
(B) is paid to the individual as compensation for services
rendered in the county (or municipality in the case of a local
income tax imposed under IC 6-3.6-6-22) IC 6-3.6-6-22 or a
special rate under IC 6-3.6-7-29) as a team member or race
team member.
SECTION 13. IC 6-3.6-2-13, AS AMENDED BY P.L.239-2017,
SECTION 15, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 13. "Local taxpayer", as it relates to a particular
county (or municipality in the case of a special rate under
IC 6-3.6-7-29) means any of the following:
(1) An individual who resides in that county (or municipality in
the case of a special rate under IC 6-3.6-7-29) on the date
specified in IC 6-3.6-8-3.
(2) An individual who maintains the taxpayer's principal place of
business or employment in that county on the date specified in
IC 6-3.6-8-3 and who does not reside on that same date in another
county in Indiana in which a tax under this article is in effect.
However, for purposes of a special rate under IC 6-3.6-7-29,
the term does not include an individual described in this
subdivision.
(3) An individual who:
(A) has income apportioned to Indiana as:
(i) a team member under IC 6-3-2-2.7; or
(ii) a race team member under IC 6-3-2-3.2;
for services rendered in the county; and
(B) is not described in subdivision (1) or (2).
SECTION 14. IC 6-3.6-2-13, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 100, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2028]: Sec. 13. "Local taxpayer" means
any of the following:
(1) As it relates to a particular county (or municipality in the case
of a local income tax imposed under IC 6-3.6-6-22),
IC 6-3.6-6-22 or a special rate under IC 6-3.6-7-29), an
individual who resides in that county (or municipality in the case
of a local income tax imposed under IC 6-3.6-6-22) IC 6-3.6-6-22
or a special rate under IC 6-3.6-7-29) on the date specified in
IC 6-3.6-8-3.
(2) As it relates to a particular county, an individual who
maintains the taxpayer's principal place of business or
2026 IN 218—LS 6925/DI 120


employment in that county on the date specified in IC 6-3.6-8-3
and who does not reside on that same date in another county in
Indiana in which a tax under this article is in effect. However, for
purposes of a local income tax imposed by a municipality under
IC 6-3.6-6-22 or a special rate under IC 6-3.6-7-29, the term
does not include an individual described in this subdivision.
(3) As it relates to a particular county, and only for purposes of a
rate imposed by a county under 6-3.6-6-2(b)(3), the term includes
an individual who:
(A) has income apportioned to Indiana as:
(i) a team member under IC 6-3-2-2.7; or
(ii) a race team member under IC 6-3-2-3.2;
for services rendered in the county; and
(B) is not described in subdivision (1) or (2).
SECTION 15. IC 6-3.6-2-15, AS ADDED BY P.L.243-2015,
SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15. "Resident local taxpayer", as it relates to a
particular county (or municipality in the case of a special rate under
IC 6-3.6-7-29), means any local taxpayer who resides in that county
(or municipality in the case of a special rate under IC 6-3.6-7-29),
on the date specified in IC 6-3.6-8-3.
SECTION 16. IC 6-3.6-2-15, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 101, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2028]: Sec. 15. "Resident local taxpayer",
as it relates to a particular county (or municipality in the case of a local
income tax imposed under IC 6-3.6-6-22), IC 6-3.6-6-22 or a special
rate under IC 6-3.6-7-29), means any local taxpayer who resides in
that county (or municipality in the case of a local income tax imposed
under IC 6-3.6-6-22) IC 6-3.6-6-22 or a special rate under
IC 6-3.6-7-29), on the date specified in IC 6-3.6-8-3.
SECTION 17. IC 6-3.6-3-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.137-2024,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) The following is the adopting body for a
county:
(1) The local income tax council in a county in which the county
income tax council adopted either:
(A) a county option income tax under IC 6-3.5-6 (repealed)
that was in effect on January 1, 2015; or
(B) a county economic development income tax for the county
under IC 6-3.5-7 (repealed) that was in effect on January 1,
2015.
(2) The county fiscal body in any other county.
2026 IN 218—LS 6925/DI 120


(3) The county fiscal body for purposes of adopting a rate
dedicated to paying for a PSAP in the county as permitted by
IC 6-3.6-6-2.5.
(4) The county fiscal body for purposes of adopting a rate
dedicated to paying for acute care hospitals in the county as
permitted by IC 6-3.6-6-2.6.
(5) The county fiscal body for purposes of adopting a rate
dedicated to paying for correctional facilities and rehabilitation
facilities in the county as permitted by IC 6-3.6-6-2.7.
(b) A local income tax council is established for each county. The
membership of each county's local income tax council consists of the
fiscal body of the county and the fiscal body of each city or town that
lies either partially or entirely within that county.
(c) The fiscal body of the city or town is the adopting body for
a city or town for purposes of adopting a special rate under
IC 6-3.6-7-29.
SECTION 18. IC 6-3.6-3-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025,
SECTION 102, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027]: Sec. 1. (a) The fiscal body of the county
is the adopting body for a county.
(b) The fiscal body of the city or town is the adopting body for a city
or town for purposes of adopting a municipal rate under IC 6-3.6-6-22
or a special rate under IC 6-3.6-7-29.
SECTION 19. IC 6-3.6-3-3.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3.2. (a) This section applies to an
ordinance adopted by a city or town that adopts, increases,
decreases, or rescinds a special rate under IC 6-3.6-7-29.
(b) An ordinance adopted by a city or town on or before
October 1 of a calendar year shall take effect on January 1 of the
calendar year that immediately succeeds the year in which the
ordinance is adopted.
(c) An ordinance adopted by a city or town after October 1 of a
calendar year shall take effect on January 1 of the second
succeeding calendar year following the year the ordinance is
adopted.
SECTION 20. IC 6-3.6-3-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.223-2025,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) The auditor of a county (or the fiscal
officer of a municipality in the case of a special rate under
IC 6-3.6-7-29) shall record all votes taken on ordinances presented for
a vote under this article and not more than ten (10) days after the vote,
2026 IN 218—LS 6925/DI 120


send a certified copy of the results to:
(1) the commissioner of the department of state revenue; and
(2) the commissioner of the department of local government
finance;
in an electronic format approved by the commissioner of the
department of local government finance.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c), this subsection applies only
to a county that has a local income tax council. The county auditor may
cease sending certified copies after the county auditor sends a certified
copy of results showing that members of the local income tax council
have cast a majority of the votes on the local income tax council for or
against the proposed ordinance.
(c) This subsection applies only to a county with a single voting bloc
that proposes to increase (but not decrease) a tax rate in the county. The
county auditor may cease sending certified copies of the votes on the
local income tax council voting as a whole under section 9.5 of this
chapter after the county auditor sends a certified copy of results
showing that the individuals who sit on the fiscal bodies of the county,
cities, and towns that are members of the local income tax council have
cast a majority of the votes on the local income tax council voting as a
whole under section 9.5 of this chapter for or against the proposed
ordinance. This subsection expires May 31, 2027.
SECTION 21. IC 6-3.6-3-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.223-2025,
SECTION 5, AND AS AMENDED BY P.L.68-2025, SECTION 106,
AND AS AMENDED BY THE TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS BILL
OF THE 2026 GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IS CORRECTED AND
AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2027]:
Sec. 5. (a) The auditor of a county (or the fiscal officer of a
municipality in the case of a local income tax imposed under
IC 6-3.6-6-22) IC 6-3.6-6-22 or a special rate under IC 6-3.6-7-29)
shall record all votes taken on ordinances presented for a vote under
this article and not more than ten (10) days after the vote, send a
certified copy of the results to:
(1) the commissioner of the department of state revenue; and
(2) the commissioner of the department of local government
finance;
in an electronic format approved by the commissioner of the
department of local government finance.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c), this subsection applies
only to a county that has a local income tax council. The county
auditor may cease sending certified copies after the county auditor
sends a certified copy of results showing that members of the local
2026 IN 218—LS 6925/DI 120


income tax council have cast a majority of the votes on the local
income tax council for or against the proposed ordinance.
(c) This subsection applies only to a county with a single voting
bloc that proposes to increase (but not decrease) a tax rate in the
county. The county auditor may cease sending certified copies of the
votes on the local income tax council voting as a whole under section
9.5 of this chapter after the county auditor sends a certified copy of
results showing that the individuals who sit on the fiscal bodies of the
county, cities, and towns that are members of the local income tax
council have cast a majority of the votes on the local income tax
council voting as a whole under section 9.5 of this chapter for or
against the proposed ordinance. This subsection expires May 31, 2027.
SECTION 22. IC 6-3.6-7-29 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 29. (a) This section applies only to a county or
municipality that adopts an ordinance to reduce the homestead
property tax cap within its taxing jurisdiction under
IC 6-1.1-20.6-7.5(c). Notwithstanding any other provision of this
section, an additional rate may be imposed by a county or
municipality under this section only during those calendar years in
which the reduced homestead property tax cap is applied under
IC 6-1.1-20.6-7.5(c) in the county or municipality for property
taxes first due in payable in the year.
(b) As used in this section, "municipality" means a city or town.
(c) The fiscal body of a county or municipality may impose a tax
on the adjusted gross income of local taxpayers at a tax rate that
does not exceed five-tenths percent (0.5%).
(d) Tax revenue derived from a tax this section shall be
distributed directly to the fiscal officer of the county or
municipality that adopted an ordinance to impose the tax under
subsection (c).
(e) Revenues raised from a tax rate imposed under this section
may be used only to fund replacement of the county's or
municipality's property tax levy loss due to the adoption of a
reduced homestead property tax cap.
(f) The tax rate under this section is in addition to the tax rate
under IC 6-3.6-6 and any other tax rate adopted by the county or
municipality under this chapter.
SECTION 23. IC 6-8.1-1-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.1-2023,
SECTION 19, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. "Listed taxes" or "taxes" includes only the
pari-mutuel taxes (IC 4-31-9-3 through IC 4-31-9-5); the supplemental
2026 IN 218—LS 6925/DI 120


wagering tax (IC 4-33-12); the riverboat wagering tax (IC 4-33-13); the
slot machine wagering tax (IC 4-35-8); the type II gambling game
excise tax (IC 4-36-9); the gross income tax (IC 6-2.1) (repealed); the
utility receipts and utility services use taxes (IC 6-2.3) (repealed); the
state gross retail and use taxes (IC 6-2.5); the adjusted gross income tax
(IC 6-3); the pass through entity tax (IC 6-3-2.1); the supplemental net
income tax (IC 6-3-8) (repealed); the county adjusted gross income tax
(IC 6-3.5-1.1) (repealed); the county option income tax (IC 6-3.5-6)
(repealed); the county economic development income tax (IC 6-3.5-7)
(repealed); the local option gross retail tax (IC 6-3.5-12); the local
income tax (IC 6-3.6); the auto rental excise tax (IC 6-6-9); the
financial institutions tax (IC 6-5.5); the gasoline tax (IC 6-6-1.1); the
special fuel tax (IC 6-6-2.5); the motor carrier fuel tax (IC 6-6-4.1); a
motor fuel tax collected under a reciprocal agreement under IC 6-8.1-3;
the vehicle excise tax (IC 6-6-5); the aviation fuel excise tax (IC
6-6-13); the commercial vehicle excise tax (IC 6-6-5.5); the excise tax
imposed on recreational vehicles and truck campers (IC 6-6-5.1); the
hazardous waste disposal tax (IC 6-6-6.6) (repealed); the heavy
equipment rental excise tax (IC 6-6-15); the vehicle sharing excise tax
(IC 6-6-16); the cigarette tax (IC 6-7-1); the closed system cartridge tax
(IC 6-7-2-7.5); the electronic cigarette tax (IC 6-7-4); the beer excise
tax (IC 7.1-4-2); the liquor excise tax (IC 7.1-4-3); the wine excise tax
(IC 7.1-4-4); the hard cider excise tax (IC 7.1-4-4.5); the petroleum
severance tax (IC 6-8-1); the various innkeeper's taxes (IC 6-9); the
various food and beverage taxes (IC 6-9); the county admissions tax
(IC 6-9-13 and IC 6-9-28); the oil inspection fee (IC 16-44-2); the
penalties assessed for oversize vehicles (IC 9-20-3 and IC 9-20-18); the
fees and penalties assessed for overweight vehicles (IC 9-20-4 and
IC 9-20-18); and any other tax or fee that the department is required to
collect or administer.
SECTION 24. IC 6-9-80 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]:
Chapter 80. Supplemental Innkeeper's Tax
Sec. 1. This chapter applies only to a county or municipality that
adopts an ordinance to reduce the homestead property tax cap
within its taxing jurisdiction under IC 6-1.1-20.6-7.5(c).
Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a
supplemental innkeeper's tax may be imposed by a county or
municipality under this chapter only during those calendar years
in which the reduced homestead property tax cap is applied under
IC 6-1.1-20.6-7.5(c) in the county or municipality for property
2026 IN 218—LS 6925/DI 120


taxes first due in payable in the year.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter:
(1) "gross retail income" and "person" have the same
meanings that are prescribed by IC 6-2.5-1; and
(2) "municipality" means a city or town.
Sec. 3. (a) The fiscal body of a county or municipality may adopt
an ordinance to levy a tax on every person engaged in the business
of renting or furnishing, for periods of less than thirty (30) days,
any room or rooms, lodgings, or accommodations in any:
(1) hotel;
(2) motel;
(3) boat motel;
(4) inn;
(5) college or university memorial union;
(6) college or university residence hall or dormitory; or
(7) tourist cabin;
located within the county or municipality, whichever is applicable.
(b) The tax does not apply to gross income received in a
transaction in which:
(1) a student rents lodgings in a college or university residence
hall while that student participates in a course of study for
which the student receives college credit from a college or
university located in the county; or
(2) a person rents a room, lodging, or accommodations for a
period of thirty (30) days or more.
(c) The tax is imposed on the gross retail income derived from
lodging income only and is in addition to:
(1) the state gross retail tax imposed under IC 6-2.5; and
(2) any other innkeeper's tax imposed on the same
transactions under another chapter of this article.
(d) The tax may not exceed the rate of five percent (5%).
(e) All of the provisions of IC 6-2.5 relating to rights, duties,
liabilities, procedures, penalties, definitions, exemptions, and
administration are applicable to the imposition and administration
of the tax imposed under this section except to the extent those
provisions are in conflict or inconsistent with the specific
provisions of this chapter or the requirements of the fiscal officer
of the county or municipality.
Sec. 4. (a) If the fiscal body of a county or municipality adopts
an ordinance under this chapter, the fiscal body of the county or
municipality shall:
(1) specify the effective date of the ordinance; and
2026 IN 218—LS 6925/DI 120


(2) immediately send a certified copy of the ordinance to the
commissioner of the department of state revenue.
(b) If an ordinance does not specify an effective date, the
ordinance shall be considered effective on the earliest date
allowable under this section.
Sec. 5. (a) Tax revenue collected under this chapter shall be paid
on a monthly basis directly to the fiscal officer of the county or
municipality that adopted an ordinance to impose the tax under
section 3 of this chapter.
(b) Amounts received under this chapter may be used only to
fund replacement of the county's or municipality's property tax
levy loss due to the adoption of a reduced homestead property tax
cap.
SECTION 25. IC 6-9-81 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]:
Chapter 81. Supplemental Food and Beverage Tax
Sec. 1. This chapter applies only to a county or municipality that
adopts an ordinance to reduce the homestead property tax cap
within its taxing jurisdiction under IC 6-1.1-20.6-7.5(c).
Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, a
supplemental food and beverage tax may be imposed by a county
or municipality under this chapter only during those calendar
years in which the reduced homestead property tax cap is applied
under IC 6-1.1-20.6-7.5(c) in the county or municipality for
property taxes first due in payable in the year.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter:
(1) "beverage" includes, but is not limited to, any alcoholic
beverage;
(2) "food" includes, but is not limited to, any food product;
(3) "gross retail income" has the same meaning as the
definition of that term contained in IC 6-2.5-1-5;
(4) "municipality" means a city or town;
(5) "person" has the same meaning as the definition of that
term contained in IC 6-2.5-1-3; and
(6) "retail merchant" has the same meaning as the definition
of that term contained in IC 6-2.5-1-8.
Sec. 3. (a) The fiscal body of a county or municipality may adopt
an ordinance to impose an excise tax, known as the supplemental
food and beverage tax, on transactions described in section 4 of this
chapter.
(b) The supplemental food and beverage tax imposed under this
2026 IN 218—LS 6925/DI 120


chapter is in addition to any other food and beverage tax imposed
on the same transactions under another chapter of this article.
(c) If the fiscal body of a county or municipality adopts an
ordinance under subsection (a), the fiscal body of a county or
municipality shall immediately send a certified copy of the
ordinance to the department of state revenue.
(d) If the fiscal body of a county or municipality adopts an
ordinance under subsection (a), the supplemental food and
beverage tax applies to transactions that occur after the last day of
the month following the month in which the ordinance is adopted.
Sec. 4. (a) Except as provided in subsection (c), a tax imposed
under section 3 of this chapter applies to a transaction in which
food or beverage is furnished, prepared, or served:
(1) for consumption at a location or on equipment provided by
a retail merchant;
(2) in the county or municipality, as applicable; and
(3) by a retail merchant for consideration.
(b) Transactions described in subsection (a)(1) include
transactions in which food or beverage is:
(1) served by a retail merchant off the merchant's premises;
(2) sold in a heated state or heated by a retail merchant;
(3) made of two (2) or more food ingredients, mixed or
combined by a retail merchant for sale as a single item (other
than food that is only cut, repackaged, or pasteurized by the
seller, and eggs, fish, meat, poultry, and foods containing these
raw animal foods requiring cooking by the consumer as
recommended by the federal Food and Drug Administration
in chapter 3, subpart 3-401.11 of its Food Code so as to
prevent food borne illnesses); or
(4) sold with eating utensils provided by a retail merchant,
including plates, knives, forks, spoons, glasses, cups, napkins,
or straws (for purposes of this subdivision, a plate does not
include a container or package used to transport food).
(c) The supplemental food and beverage tax does not apply to
the furnishing, preparing, or serving of a food or beverage in a
transaction that is exempt, or to the extent the transaction is
exempt, from the state gross retail tax imposed by IC 6-2.5.
Sec. 5. The supplemental food and beverage tax rate:
(1) must be imposed in an increment of twenty-five
hundredths percent (0.25%); and
(2) may not exceed one percent (1%);
of the gross retail income received by the merchant from the food
2026 IN 218—LS 6925/DI 120


or beverage transaction described in section 4 of this chapter. For
purposes of this chapter, the gross retail income received by the
retail merchant from a transaction does not include the amount of
tax imposed on the transaction under IC 6-2.5.
Sec. 6. A tax imposed under this chapter shall be imposed, paid,
and collected in the same manner that the state gross retail tax is
imposed, paid, and collected under IC 6-2.5. However, the return
to be filed with the payment of the tax imposed under this chapter
may be made on a separate return or may be combined with the
return filed for the payment of the state gross retail tax, as
prescribed by the department of state revenue.
Sec. 7. (a) Tax revenue collected under this chapter shall be paid
on a monthly basis directly to the fiscal officer of the county or
municipality that adopted the ordinance to impose the
supplemental food and beverage tax under section 3 of this
chapter.
(b) Amounts received under this chapter may be used only to
fund replacement of the county's or municipality's property tax
levy loss due to the adoption of a reduced homestead property tax
cap.
2026 IN 218—LS 6925/DI 120